Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2654.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6882HV (2) 91 je/ns H.F. 2654 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 261M.1 Short title. 1 This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the âFirst 2 Responder Dependent Education Actâ . 3 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 261M.2 Definitions. 4 1. âAssociate degree programâ means a degree program offered 5 by a community college that requires completion of at least 6 sixty semester credit hours or an equivalent program of study. 7 âAssociate degree programâ does not include a baccalaureate 8 degree program. 9 2. âDependentâ means a child of a first responder who is 10 claimed as a dependent for state or federal tax purposes for 11 the most recent tax year. 12 3. âEmergency medical care providerâ means an individual 13 certified pursuant to section 147A.6. 14 4. âEmployâ or âemploymentâ includes work as a volunteer. 15 5. âFire fighterâ means a paid or volunteer member of a fire 16 department who is certified under section 100B.6. 17 6. âFirst responderâ means a law enforcement officer, fire 18 fighter, or emergency medical care provider. 19 7. âLaw enforcement officerâ means a person who is 20 responsible for the prevention or detection of crime or the 21 enforcement of the criminal, traffic, or highway laws of this 22 state or any political subdivision of this state for more than 23 one hundred hours per year, and who is authorized by law to 24 make arrests. 25 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 261M.3 Eligibility for tuition waiver. 26 A community college shall grant a dependent of a first 27 responder a waiver of resident tuition if the dependent does 28 all of the following: 29 1. Meets all admission requirements of the community 30 college. 31 2. Enrolls in the community college and pursues studies 32 leading to any of the following: 33 a. An associate degree related to a career in public safety 34 or emergency response. 35 -1- LSB 6882HV (2) 91 je/ns 1/ 4 H.F. 2654 b. A degree or credential in a high-demand job as determined 1 by the workforce development board pursuant to section 84A.1B, 2 subsection 3. 3 3. Submits verification that the dependentâs parent 4 or legal guardian was employed for at least six years as a 5 first responder and at the time of the dependentâs initial 6 application for a waiver is either an active first responder in 7 Iowa or is retired. Verification must include a certificate of 8 satisfactory performance from a supervisor within the agency 9 that employs or most recently employed the first responder. 10 Employment by multiple employers or in multiple first responder 11 occupations shall be counted for purposes of the six-year 12 period. 13 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 261M.4 Waiver amount and duration. 14 1. The amount of a waiver under this chapter shall be the 15 amount of the dependentâs resident tuition remaining after 16 subtracting all of the following received by the dependent: 17 a. Any federal grants. 18 b. Any state scholarships and grants. 19 c. Any awards from the future ready Iowa skilled workforce 20 last-dollar scholarship program under section 256.228. 21 2. An eligible dependent may receive the tuition waiver 22 for no more than two academic years, provided the dependent 23 continues to meet the requirements of this chapter and all 24 policies of the community college on continued enrollment and 25 progress toward completion of the applicable degree or program. 26 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 261M.5 In-state residency requirement. 27 1. As a condition of receiving a tuition waiver under this 28 chapter, a dependent shall remain a resident of the state 29 of Iowa for a period of not less than five years following 30 completion of the degree or program for which the waiver was 31 received. 32 2. A dependent who voluntarily relocates outside the state 33 before completing the required five-year period shall repay to 34 the community college the prorated amount of tuition waived on 35 -2- LSB 6882HV (2) 91 je/ns 2/ 4 H.F. 2654 the dependentâs behalf. The community college shall determine 1 the prorated repayment amount based on the portion of the 2 five-year residency obligation not completed. 3 3. Repayment under this section shall not be required if the 4 dependentâs relocation is due to death, permanent disability, 5 or other good cause as determined by the community college. 6 4. If a first responder dies in the line of duty after the 7 dependentâs initial application for a waiver is submitted, the 8 dependent shall remain eligible for the tuition waiver and 9 shall not be subject to subsection 1. 10 5. A community college shall adopt procedures for 11 monitoring compliance with this section and for administering 12 repayment obligations. 13 Sec. 6. IMPLEMENTATION OF ACT. Section 25B.2, subsection 14 3, shall not apply to this Act. 15